District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.12

Additional licenses.

In addition to the licenses processed under the basic business license system that were required prior to the effective date of this subchapter, use of the basic business license system shall be expanded as needed for the processing of additional licenses as provided by District law.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(m), 50 DCR 6913

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.12.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38 substituted “basic” for “master” throughout the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(m) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).